Indiana, session 2026, SB114.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 3-5-2.1-97, AS ADDED BY P.L.186-2025,
SECTION 6, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 97. "State office" refers to: the
(1) governor;
(2) lieutenant governor;
(3) secretary of state;
(4) state comptroller (referred to as "auditor of state" in the
Constitution of the State of Indiana);
(5) treasurer of state;
(6) attorney general;
(7) justice of the supreme court;
(8) judge of the court of appeals; and
(9) judge of the tax court; and
(10) after November 6, 2028, member of the Indiana utility
regulatory commission.
2026 IN 114—LS 6344/DI 119


SECTION 2. IC 3-5-2.1-102.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 102.5. "Utility regulatory
district" has the meaning set forth in IC 8-1-1-1.7.
SECTION 3. IC 3-8-1-14.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 14.5. (a) The definitions in IC 3-9-2-14 apply
throughout this section.
(b) A candidate for election to the Indiana utility regulatory
commission:
(1) must have resided in Indiana for at least one (1) year
before the election; and
(2) may not have any official or professional relationship or
connection with, hold any stock or securities in, or have any
pecuniary interest in:
(A) a utility; or
(B) a person with an interest in a utility.
SECTION 4. IC 3-8-1-33, AS AMENDED BY P.L.40-2025,
SECTION 2, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 33. (a) A candidate for an office listed in
subsection (b) must file a statement of economic interests.
(b) Whenever a candidate for any of the following offices is also
required to file a declaration of candidacy or is nominated by petition,
the candidate shall file a statement of economic interests before filing
the declaration of candidacy or declaration of intent to be a write-in
candidate, before the petition of nomination is filed, before the
certificate of nomination is filed, or before being appointed to fill a
candidate vacancy under IC 3-13-1 or IC 3-13-2:
(1) Governor, lieutenant governor, secretary of state, state
comptroller (auditor of state), treasurer of state, and attorney
general, in accordance with IC 4-2-6-8.
(2) Senator and representative in the general assembly, in
accordance with IC 2-2.2-2.
(3) Justice of the supreme court, judge of the court of appeals,
judge of the tax court, judge of a circuit court, judge of a superior
court, judge of a probate court, judge of a city court, judge of a
town court, and prosecuting attorney, in accordance with
IC 33-23-11-14 and IC 33-23-11-15.
(4) A candidate for a local office or school board office, in
accordance with IC 3-8-9, except a candidate for a local office
described in subdivision (3).
2026 IN 114—LS 6344/DI 119


(5) A candidate for election to the Indiana utility regulatory
commission.
SECTION 5. IC 3-8-2-1 IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. This chapter applies to the
following:
(1) Each political party in the state whose nominee received at
least ten percent (10%) of the total vote cast for secretary of state
at the last election.
(2) Write-in candidates.
(3) Candidates for election to the Indiana utility regulatory
commission.
SECTION 6. IC 3-8-2-5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.216-2015,
SECTION 5, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5. A declaration of candidacy for:
(1) a federal office;
(2) a state office;
(3) a legislative office; or
(4) the local office of:
(A) judge of a circuit, superior, probate, or small claims court;
or
(B) prosecuting attorney of a judicial circuit; or
(5) election to the Indiana utility regulatory commission;
shall be filed with the secretary of state.
SECTION 7. IC 3-8-2-7, AS AMENDED BY P.L.240-2025,
SECTION 18, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 7. (a) The declaration of each candidate required
by this chapter must be signed before a person authorized to administer
oaths and contain the following information:
(1) The candidate's name, printed or typewritten as:
(A) the candidate wants the candidate's name to appear on the
ballot; and
(B) the candidate's name is permitted to appear on the ballot
under IC 3-5-7.
A candidate must specify, by a designation described in
IC 3-5-7-5, each designation that the candidate wants to use that
is permitted by IC 3-5-7.
(2) A statement that the candidate is a registered voter and the
location of the candidate's precinct and township (or ward, if
applicable, and city or town), county, and state.
(3) The candidate's complete residence address, and if the
candidate's mailing address is different from the residence
address, the mailing address.
2026 IN 114—LS 6344/DI 119


(4) This subdivision does not apply to a candidate for election
to the Indiana utility regulatory commission. A statement of
the candidate's party affiliation. For purposes of this subdivision,
a candidate is considered to be affiliated with a political party
only if any of the following applies:
(A) The two (2) most recent primary elections in Indiana in
which the candidate voted were primary elections held by the
party with which the candidate claims affiliation. If the
candidate cast a nonpartisan ballot at an election held at either
of the two (2) most recent primary elections in which the
candidate voted, a certification by the county chairman under
clause (B) is required.
(B) The county chairman of:
(i) the political party with which the candidate claims
affiliation; and
(ii) the county in which the candidate resides;
certifies that the candidate is a member of the political party.
The declaration of candidacy must inform candidates how party
affiliation is determined under this subdivision and permit the
candidate to indicate on the declaration of candidacy which of
clauses (A) or (B) applies to the candidate. If a candidate claims
party affiliation under clause (B), the candidate must attach to the
candidate's declaration of candidacy the written certification of
the county chairman required by clause (B).
(5) A statement that the candidate complies with all requirements
under the laws of Indiana to be a candidate for the above named
office, including any applicable residency requirements, and that
the candidate is not ineligible to be a candidate due to a criminal
conviction that would prohibit the candidate from serving in the
office.
(6) If the candidate is a candidate for election to the Indiana
utility regulatory commission, the utility regulatory district
the candidate seeks to represent.
(6) (7) This subdivision does not apply to a candidate for
election to the Indiana utility regulatory commission. A
request that the candidate's name be placed on the official primary
ballot of that party to be voted on, the office for which the
candidate is declaring, and the date of the primary election.
(7) (8) The following statements:
(A) A statement that the candidate has attached either of the
following to the declaration:
(i) A copy of a statement of economic interests, file stamped
2026 IN 114—LS 6344/DI 119


by the office required to receive the statement of economic
interests.
(ii) A receipt or photocopy of a receipt showing that a
statement of economic interests has been filed.
This requirement does not apply to a candidate for a federal
office.
(B) A statement that the candidate understands that if the
candidate is elected to the office, the candidate may be
required to obtain and file an individual surety bond before
serving in the office. This requirement does not apply to a
candidate for a federal office or legislative office.
(C) A statement that the candidate understands that if the
candidate is elected to the office, the candidate may be
required to successfully complete training or have attained
certification related to service in an elected office. This
requirement does not apply to a candidate for a federal office,
state office, or legislative office.
(D) A statement that the candidate:
(i) is aware of the provisions of IC 3-9 regarding campaign
finance and the reporting of campaign contributions and
expenditures; and
(ii) agrees to comply with the provisions of IC 3-9.
This requirement does not apply to a candidate for a federal
office.
The candidate must separately initial each of the statements
required by this subdivision.
(8) (9) A statement as to whether the candidate has been a
candidate for state, legislative, or local office in a previous
primary, municipal, special, or general election and whether the
candidate has filed all reports required by IC 3-9-5-10 for all
previous candidacies.
(9) (10) If the candidate is subject to IC 3-9-1-5, a statement that
the candidate has filed a campaign finance statement of
organization for the candidate's principal committee or is aware
that the candidate may be required to file a campaign finance
statement of organization not later than noon seven (7) days after
the final date to file the declaration of candidacy under section 4
of this chapter.
(10) (11) The candidate's signature.
(b) The election division shall provide that the form of a declaration
of candidacy includes the following information:
(1) The dates for filing campaign finance reports under IC 3-9.
2026 IN 114—LS 6344/DI 119


(2) The penalties for late filing of campaign finance reports under
IC 3-9.
(c) A declaration of candidacy must include a statement that the
candidate requests the name on the candidate's voter registration record
be the same as the name the candidate uses on the declaration of
candidacy. If there is a difference between the name on the candidate's
declaration of candidacy and the name on the candidate's voter
registration record, the officer with whom the declaration of candidacy
is filed shall forward the information to the voter registration officer of
the appropriate county as required by IC 3-5-7-6(d). The voter
registration officer of the appropriate county shall change the name on
the candidate's voter registration record to be the same as the name on
the candidate's declaration of candidacy.
SECTION 8. IC 3-9-2-14 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 14. (a) As used in this section, "person with an
interest in a utility" means any of the following:
(1) A person related to (as defined in IC 26-1-9.1-102(a)(63))
a utility.
(2) An individual who, alone or in combination with one (1) or
more members of the individual's household or family listed
in IC 3-6-6-7(a)(4), has:
(A) the power to vote, directly or indirectly, at least
twenty-five percent (25%) of the outstanding voting shares
or voting interests of a utility;
(B) the power to elect or appoint a majority of key
individuals or executive officers, managers, directors,
trustees, or other persons exercising managerial authority
of a utility; or
(C) the power to exercise, directly or indirectly, a
controlling influence over the management or policies of a
utility.
(b) As used in this section, "utility" means:
(1) a public utility (as defined in IC 8-1-2-1(a));
(2) a corporation organized under IC 8-1-13;
(3) a municipally owned utility (as defined in IC 8-1-2-1(h));
and
(4) a corporation that is organized under IC 23-17 that is an
electric cooperative and that has at least one (1) member that
is a corporation organized under IC 8-1-13;
regardless of whether the entity described in subdivisions (1)
through (4) is subject to the jurisdiction of the Indiana utility
2026 IN 114—LS 6344/DI 119


regulatory commission for approval of rates and charges.
(c) A:
(1) candidate for election to the Indiana utility regulatory
commission; or
(2) candidate's committee of a candidate for election to the
Indiana utility regulatory commission;
may not solicit or accept a contribution from a utility, or from a
person with an interest in a utility, for the duration of the
candidate's candidacy for election to the Indiana utility regulatory
commission.
SECTION 9. IC 3-10-2-6, AS AMENDED BY P.L.141-2023,
SECTION 8, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 6. The following public officials shall be elected
in 2024, 2028, 2032, 2036, 2040, 2044, and every four (4) years
thereafter:
(1) Governor.
(2) Lieutenant governor.
(3) Attorney general.
(4) The following members of the Indiana utility regulatory
commission:
(A) The member described in IC 8-1-1-2.3(1).
(B) One (1) member described in IC 8-1-1-2.3(2).
(C) One (1) member described in IC 8-1-1-2.3(3).
SECTION 10. IC 3-10-2-7, AS AMENDED BY P.L.40-2025,
SECTION 4, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 7. (a) The following public officials shall be
elected in 2026, 2030, 2034, 2038, 2042, and every four (4) years
thereafter:
(1) Secretary of state.
(2) State comptroller (referred to as "auditor of state" in the
Constitution of the State of Indiana).
(3) Treasurer of state.
(4) Beginning with the election in 2030, the following members
of the Indiana utility regulatory commission:
(A) The member described in IC 8-1-1-2.3(2) who is not
elected under section 6(4)(B) of this chapter.
(B) The member described in IC 8-1-1-2.3(3) who is not
elected under section 6(4)(C) of this chapter.
(b) Subject to IC 3-11-13-11 and IC 3-11-14-3.5, for purposes of the
2026 general election, the public official set forth in subsection (a)(2)
must be listed as the following on the general election ballot:
"State Comptroller (Auditor of State)".
2026 IN 114—LS 6344/DI 119


SECTION 11. IC 3-10-2-10.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 10.5. A member of the Indiana
utility regulatory commission shall be elected by voters residing in
the utility regulatory district represented by the member under
IC 8-1-1-2.3.
SECTION 12. IC 3-11-2-12, AS AMENDED BY P.L.40-2025,
SECTION 5, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 12. (a) The following offices shall be placed on
the general election ballot in the following order after the public
questions described in section 10(a) of this chapter:
(1) Federal and state offices:
(A) President and Vice President of the United States.
(B) United States Senator.
(C) Governor and lieutenant governor.
(D) Secretary of state.
(E) State comptroller (auditor of state).
(F) Treasurer of state.
(G) Attorney general.
(H) United States Representative. If an election to fill a
vacancy in an office of United States Representative under
IC 3-10-8 is held on the same day as the election for the next
term of the same office, the ballot shall list the election to fill
the vacancy in the office immediately after the election for the
next term of the office.
(I) Member of the Indiana utility regulatory commission,
as provided in section 12.1 of this chapter.
(2) Legislative offices:
(A) State senator.
(B) State representative.
(3) Circuit offices and county judicial offices:
(A) Judge of the circuit court, and unless otherwise specified
under IC 33, with each division separate if there is more than
one (1) judge of the circuit court.
(B) Judge of the superior court, and unless otherwise specified
under IC 33, with each division separate if there is more than
one (1) judge of the superior court.
(C) Judge of the probate court.
(D) Prosecuting attorney.
(E) Clerk of the circuit court.
(4) County offices:
(A) County auditor.
2026 IN 114—LS 6344/DI 119


(B) County recorder.
(C) County treasurer.
(D) County sheriff.
(E) County coroner.
(F) County surveyor.
(G) County assessor.
(H) County commissioner.
(I) County council member.
(5) Township offices:
(A) Township assessor (only in a township referred to in
IC 36-6-5-1(d)).
(B) Township trustee.
(C) Township board member.
(D) Judge of the small claims court.
(E) Constable of the small claims court.
(6) City offices:
(A) Mayor.
(B) Clerk or clerk-treasurer.
(C) Judge of the city court.
(D) City-county council member or common council member.
(7) Town offices:
(A) Clerk-treasurer.
(B) Judge of the town court.
(C) Town council member.
(b) If a major political party does not nominate a candidate for an
office on a general, municipal, or special election ballot then the county
election board may print "NO CANDIDATE FILED" in the place on
the ballot where the name of the major political party's nominee would
be printed.
SECTION 13. IC 3-11-2-12.1 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 12.1. (a) The following apply in
a general election held in a year described in IC 3-10-2-6:
(1) On a ballot provided to voters in a county listed in
IC 8-1-1-1.7(1), the member of the Indiana utility regulatory
commission described in IC 3-10-2-6(4)(A) shall be placed on
the ballot under section 12(a)(1)(I) of this chapter in the
following form:
"Commissioner of the Indiana Utility Regulatory
Commission (central district)".
(2) On a ballot provided to voters in a county listed in
IC 8-1-1-1.7(2), the member of the Indiana utility regulatory
2026 IN 114—LS 6344/DI 119


commission described in IC 3-10-2-6(4)(B) shall be placed on
the ballot under section 12(a)(1)(I) of this chapter in the
following form:
"Commissioner of the Indiana Utility Regulatory
Commission (northern district)".
(3) On a ballot provided to voters in a county listed in
IC 8-1-1-1.7(3), the member of the Indiana utility regulatory
commission described in IC 3-10-2-6(4)(C) shall be placed on
the ballot under section 12(a)(1)(I) of this chapter in the
following form:
"Commissioner of the Indiana Utility Regulatory
Commission (southern district)".
(b) The following apply in a general election held in a year
described in IC 3-10-2-7(a):
(1) On a ballot provided to voters in a county listed in
IC 8-1-1-1.7(2), the member of the Indiana utility regulatory
commission described in IC 3-10-2-7(a)(4)(A) shall be placed
on the ballot under section 12(a)(1)(I) of this chapter in the
following form:
"Commissioner of the Indiana Utility Regulatory
Commission (northern district)".
(2) On a ballot provided to voters in a county listed in
IC 8-1-1-1.7(3), the member of the Indiana utility regulatory
commission described in IC 3-10-2-7(a)(4)(B) shall be placed
on the ballot under section 12(a)(1)(I) of this chapter in the
following form:
"Commissioner of the Indiana Utility Regulatory
Commission (southern district)".
SECTION 14. IC 3-13-4-3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.225-2011,
SECTION 84, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3. (a) This section applies to a vacancy that occurs
in a state office other than governor, lieutenant governor, or a judicial
office.
(b) If a state officer wants to resign from office, the state officer
must resign as provided in IC 5-8-3.5.
(c) A vacancy that occurs in a state office because of the death of
the state officer may be certified to the governor under IC 5-8-6. The
governor may not fill a vacancy as provided by law until the governor
receives notice of the death under IC 5-8-6.
(d) A vacancy that occurs in a state office other than by resignation
or death shall be certified to the governor by the circuit court clerk of
the county in which the officer resided.
2026 IN 114—LS 6344/DI 119


(e) This subsection does not apply to a vacancy in the
membership of the Indiana utility regulatory commission. The
governor shall fill a vacancy in a state office by appointment of a
person of the same political party as the officer who held the vacated
office.
(f) The person who is appointed by the governor holds office for the
remainder of the unexpired term and until a successor is elected and
qualified.
SECTION 15. IC 4-2-6-8, AS AMENDED BY P.L.9-2024,
SECTION 34, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 8. (a) The following persons shall file a written
financial disclosure statement:
(1) The governor, the lieutenant governor, the secretary of state,
the state comptroller, the treasurer of state, and the attorney
general, and a member of the Indiana utility regulatory
commission.
(2) Any candidate for one (1) of the offices in subdivision (1) who
is not the holder of one (1) of those offices.
(3) Any person who is the appointing authority of an agency.
(4) The director of each division of the Indiana department of
administration.
(5) Any purchasing agent within the procurement division of the
Indiana department of administration.
(6) Any agency employee, special state appointee, former agency
employee, or former special state appointee with final purchasing
authority.
(7) The chief investment officer employed by the Indiana public
retirement system.
(8) Any employee of the Indiana public retirement system whose
duties include the recommendation, selection, and management
of:
(A) the investments of the funds administered by the Indiana
public retirement system;
(B) the investment options offered in the annuity savings
accounts in the public employees' retirement fund and the
Indiana state teachers' retirement fund;
(C) the investment options offered in the legislators' defined
contribution plan; or
(D) investment managers, investment advisors, and other
investment service providers of the Indiana public retirement
system.
(9) An employee required to do so by rule adopted by the
2026 IN 114—LS 6344/DI 119


inspector general.
(b) The statement shall be filed with the inspector general as
follows:
(1) Not later than February 1 of every year, in the case of the state
officers and employees enumerated in subsection (a).
(2) If the individual has not previously filed under subdivision (1)
during the present calendar year and is filing as a candidate for a
state office listed in subsection (a)(1), before filing a declaration
of candidacy under IC 3-8-2 or IC 3-8-4-11, petition of
nomination under IC 3-8-6, or declaration of intent to be a
write-in candidate under IC 3-8-2-2.5, or before a certificate of
nomination is filed under IC 3-8-7-8, in the case of a candidate for
one (1) of the state offices (unless the statement has already been
filed when required under IC 3-8-4-11).
(3) Not later than sixty (60) days after employment or taking
office, unless the previous employment or office required the
filing of a statement under this section.
(4) Not later than thirty (30) days after leaving employment or
office, unless the subsequent employment or office requires the
filing of a statement under this section.
The statement must be made under affirmation.
(c) The statement shall set forth the following information for the
preceding calendar year or, in the case of a state officer or employee
who leaves office or employment, the period since a previous statement
was filed:
(1) The name and address of any person known:
(A) to have a business relationship with the agency of the state
officer or employee or the office sought by the candidate; and
(B) from whom the state officer, candidate, or the employee,
or that individual's spouse or unemancipated children received
a gift or gifts having a total fair market value in excess of one
hundred dollars ($100).
(2) The location of all real property in which the state officer,
candidate, or the employee or that individual's spouse or
unemancipated children has an equitable or legal interest either
amounting to five thousand dollars ($5,000) or more or
comprising ten percent (10%) of the state officer's, candidate's, or
the employee's net worth or the net worth of that individual's
spouse or unemancipated children. An individual's primary
personal residence need not be listed, unless it also serves as
income property.
(3) The names and the nature of the business of the employers of
2026 IN 114—LS 6344/DI 119


the state officer, candidate, or the employee and that individual's
spouse.
(4) The following information about any sole proprietorship
owned or professional practice operated by the state officer,
candidate, or the employee or that individual's spouse:
(A) The name of the sole proprietorship or professional
practice.
(B) The nature of the business.
(C) Whether any clients are known to have had a business
relationship with the agency of the state officer or employee or
the office sought by the candidate.
(D) The name of any client or customer from whom the state
officer, candidate, employee, or that individual's spouse
received more than thirty-three percent (33%) of the state
officer's, candidate's, employee's, or that individual's spouse's
nonstate income in a year.
(5) The name of any partnership of which the state officer,
candidate, or the employee or that individual's spouse is a member
and the nature of the partnership's business.
(6) The name of any corporation (other than a church) of which
the state officer, candidate, or the employee or that individual's
spouse is an officer or a director and the nature of the
corporation's business.
(7) The name of any corporation in which the state officer,
candidate, or the employee or that individual's spouse or
unemancipated children own stock or stock options having a fair
market value in excess of ten thousand dollars ($10,000).
However, if the stock is held in a blind trust, the name of the
administrator of the trust must be disclosed on the statement
instead of the name of the corporation. A time or demand deposit
in a financial institution or insurance policy need not be listed.
(8) The name and address of the most recent former employer.
(9) Additional information that the person making the disclosure
chooses to include.
Any such state officer, candidate, or employee may file an amended
statement upon discovery of additional information required to be
reported.
(d) A person who:
(1) fails to file a statement required by rule or this section in a
timely manner; or
(2) files a deficient statement;
upon a majority vote of the commission, is subject to a civil penalty at
2026 IN 114—LS 6344/DI 119


a rate of not more than ten dollars ($10) for each day the statement
remains delinquent or deficient. The maximum penalty under this
subsection is one thousand dollars ($1,000).
(e) A person who intentionally or knowingly files a false statement
commits a Class A infraction.
SECTION 16. IC 8-1-1-1.7 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 1.7. As used in this chapter, "utility regulatory
district" refers to any one (1) of the following:
(1) The central district, which is comprised of the following
counties:
(A) Boone County.
(B) Clay County.
(C) Clinton County.
(D) Decatur County.
(E) Delaware County.
(F) Fayette County.
(G) Fountain County.
(H) Franklin County.
(I) Greene County.
(J) Hamilton County.
(K) Hancock County.
(L) Hendricks County.
(M) Henry County.
(N) Jay County.
(O) Johnson County.
(P) Madison County.
(Q) Marion County.
(R) Monroe County.
(S) Montgomery County.
(T) Morgan County.
(U) Owen County.
(V) Parke County.
(W) Putnam County.
(X) Randolph County.
(Y) Rush County.
(Z) Shelby County.
(AA) Sullivan County.
(BB) Tippecanoe County.
(CC) Tipton County.
(DD) Union County.
(EE) Vermillion County.
2026 IN 114—LS 6344/DI 119


(FF) Vigo County.
(GG) Wayne County.
(2) The northern district, which is comprised of the following
counties:
(A) Adams County.
(B) Allen County.
(C) Benton County.
(D) Blackford County.
(E) Carroll County.
(F) Cass County.
(G) DeKalb County.
(H) Elkhart County.
(I) Fulton County.
(J) Grant County.
(K) Howard County.
(L) Huntington County.
(M) Jasper County.
(N) Kosciusko County.
(O) LaGrange County.
(P) Lake County.
(Q) LaPorte County.
(R) Marshall County.
(S) Miami County.
(T) Newton County.
(U) Noble County.
(V) Porter County.
(W) Pulaski County.
(X) St. Joseph County.
(Y) Starke County.
(Z) Steuben County.
(AA) Wabash County.
(BB) Warren County.
(CC) Wells County.
(DD) White County.
(EE) Whitley County.
(3) The southern district, which is comprised of the following
counties:
(A) Bartholomew County.
(B) Brown County.
(C) Clark County.
(D) Crawford County.
(E) Daviess County.
2026 IN 114—LS 6344/DI 119


(F) Dearborn County.
(G) Dubois County.
(H) Floyd County.
(I) Gibson County.
(J) Harrison County.
(K) Jackson County.
(L) Jefferson County.
(M) Jennings County.
(N) Knox County.
(O) Lawrence County.
(P) Martin County.
(Q) Ohio County.
(R) Orange County.
(S) Perry County.
(T) Pike County.
(U) Posey County.
(V) Ripley County.
(W) Scott County.
(X) Spencer County.
(Y) Switzerland County.
(Z) Vanderburgh County.
(AA) Warrick County.
(BB) Washington County.
SECTION 17. IC 8-1-1-2, AS AMENDED BY P.L.136-2018,
SECTION 42, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. (a) There is created the Indiana utility
regulatory commission which shall consist of five (5) members. at least
one (1) of whom shall be an attorney qualified to practice law before
the supreme court of Indiana and not more than three (3) of whom
belong to the same political party.
(b) The members of the commission and all vacancies occurring on
the commission shall be appointed by the governor from among
persons nominated by the nominating committee in accordance with
IC 8-1-1.5.
(c) The members may be removed at any time by the governor for
cause.
(d) (b) The governor shall appoint one (1) member of the
commission as chairman.
(e) (c) Except as provided in subsection (d), the members of the
commission shall be appointed for serve a term of four (4) years.
except when a member is appointed
(d) The governor shall appoint an individual to fill a vacancy in
2026 IN 114—LS 6344/DI 119


which case such appointment shall be for such unexpired term only. on
the commission from among persons nominated by the nominating
committee in accordance with IC 8-1-1.5. A member appointed to
fill a vacancy on the commission serves for the duration provided
by IC 3-13-4-3(f).
(e) All members of said the commission shall serve as such until
their successors are duly appointed and qualified, and while so serving
shall devote full time to the duties of the commission and shall not be
actively engaged in any other occupation, profession, or business that
constitutes a conflict of interest or otherwise interferes with carrying
out their duties as commissioners.
(f) A member of the commission or any person appointed to any
position or employed in any capacity to serve the commission, may not
have any official or professional relationship or connection with, or
hold any stock or securities or have any pecuniary interest in any public
utility operating in Indiana.
(g) Each member appointed to the Indiana utility regulatory of the
commission shall take and subscribe to an oath in writing that the
member will faithfully perform the duties of the member's office, and
support and defend to the best of the member's ability the Constitution
and laws of the state of Indiana and of the United States of America,
and such each member's oath shall be filed with the secretary of state.
(h) The chairman of the commission shall assign cases to the
various members of the commission or to administrative law judges for
hearings.
SECTION 18. IC 8-1-1-2.1 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 2.1. (a) The members of the commission shall be
appointed by the governor from among persons nominated by the
nominating committee in accordance with IC 8-1-1.5.
(b) At least one (1) member of the commission must be an
attorney qualified to practice law before the supreme court of
Indiana.
(c) Not more than three (3) members of the commission may
belong to the same political party.
(d) A member of the commission may be removed at any time
by the governor for cause.
(e) A member of the commission shall serve as a member until
the member's successor is duly appointed and qualified.
(f) This section expires November 6, 2028.
SECTION 19. IC 8-1-1-2.2 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
2026 IN 114—LS 6344/DI 119


UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 2.2. (a) The governor shall:
(1) reappoint; or
(2) appoint a successor to;
a member of the commission whose term expires after December
31, 2024, but before January 1, 2026. The term of the member
appointed or reappointed under this subsection ends upon the
election of the member elected under IC 3-10-2-6(4)(A), who is the
successor of the member appointed or reappointed under this
subsection.
(b) The governor shall appoint a successor to a member of the
commission whose term expires after December 31, 2025, but
before April 1, 2026. The term of the member appointed or
reappointed under this subsection ends upon the election of the
member elected under IC 3-10-2-6(4)(B), who is the successor of
the member appointed or reappointed under this subsection.
(c) The governor shall:
(1) reappoint; or
(2) appoint a successor to;
a member of the commission whose term expires after March 31,
2026, but before January 1, 2027. The term of the member
appointed or reappointed under this subsection ends upon the
election of the member elected under IC 3-10-2-6(4)(C), who is the
successor of the member appointed or reappointed under this
subsection.
(d) The governor shall:
(1) reappoint; or
(2) appoint a successor to;
a member of the commission whose term expires after December
31, 2026, but before January 1, 2028. The term of the member
appointed or reappointed under this subsection ends upon the
election of the member elected under IC 3-10-2-7(a)(4)(A), who is
the successor of the member appointed or reappointed under this
subsection.
(e) The governor shall:
(1) reappoint; or
(2) appoint a successor to;
a member of the commission whose term expires after December
31, 2027, but before January 1, 2029. The term of the member
appointed or reappointed under this subsection ends upon the
election of the member elected under IC 3-10-2-7(a)(4)(B), who is
the successor of the member appointed or reappointed under this
subsection.
2026 IN 114—LS 6344/DI 119


(f) If a member appointed or reappointed under this section
vacates the member's position as a member of the commission
before the member's successor is elected, the governor shall
appoint an individual to fill the vacancy under section 2(d) of this
chapter such that:
(1) at least one (1) member of the commission is an attorney
qualified to practice law before the supreme court of Indiana;
and
(2) not more than three (3) members of the commission belong
to the same political party.
(g) This section expires November 5, 2030.
SECTION 20. IC 8-1-1-2.3 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 2.3. Members of the commission elected under
IC 3-10-2 represent the three utility regulatory districts as follows:
(1) One (1) member:
(A) must reside in; and
(B) shall represent utility customers located in;
the central district.
(2) Two (2) members:
(A) must reside in; and
(B) shall represent utility customers located in;
the northern district.
(3) Two (2) members:
(A) must reside in; and
(B) shall represent utility customers located in;
the southern district.
SECTION 21. IC 8-1-1-2.4 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 2.4. (a) Subject to subsections (b) and (c), the
chairman of the commission shall assign a case to:
(1) a member of the commission; or
(2) an administrative law judge;
for a hearing.
(b) If the outcome of a case scheduled to be heard after
November 6, 2028, and before November 5, 2030, would potentially
affect utility rates for retail utility customers, the chairman of the
commission shall, to the extent practicable, assign the case to a
member of the commission representing the utility regulatory
district containing the largest number of retail utility customers
whose rates would be affected.
(c) If the outcome of a case scheduled to be heard after
2026 IN 114—LS 6344/DI 119


November 4, 2030, would potentially affect utility rates for retail
utility customers, the chairman of the commission shall assign the
case to a member of the commission representing the utility
regulatory district containing the largest number of retail utility
customers whose rates would be affected.
SECTION 22. IC 8-1-1.5-2 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. As used in The
following definitions apply throughout this chapter:
(1) "Nominating committee" or "committee" means the
nominating committee established by section 3 of this chapter.
(2) "Vacancy" means an opening on the membership of the
commission or nominating committee which occurs by reason of
death, retirement, resignation, removal, expiration of term without
reappointment or appointment of a successor member (before
November 5, 2030), or election of a successor member (after
November 4, 2030).
SECTION 23. An emergency is declared for this act.
2026 IN 114—LS 6344/DI 119